Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1625.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Keystone Artificial Intelligence Authority Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." An individual, partnership, association, corporation or other legal entity that submits a request to a Commonwealth agency for a permit related to a project within a target industry.123456789101112131415161718192021 "Authority." The Keystone Artificial Intelligence Authority established under section 3."Board." The governing board of the authority established under section 4."Commonwealth agency." A department, board, commission or other administrative unit of the Commonwealth that is authorized by law to issue permits related to development activities."Completed application." An application submitted to a Commonwealth agency that includes all information, documentation and forms required by applicable law, regulation or published guidance and that has been formally acknowledged as complete by the Commonwealth agency."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Permit." A license, certification, approval, registration or other authorization required by a Commonwealth agency for the initiation, construction or operation of a facility or project within a target industry."Permit navigator program." A centralized program administered by the authority to coordinate and expedite all State-level permitting processes."Permit navigator system." A digital platform developed and maintained by the authority to facilitate permit coordination, applicant-agency communications, real-time status tracking and publication of performance metrics."Target industry." Artificial intelligence facilities, data centers, semiconductor manufacturing, cloud infrastructure, cooling and grid technologies and other emerging technologies as designated by the authority.Section 3. Establishment of authority.20250HB1625PN1966 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The Keystone Artificial Intelligence Authority is established within the department.Section 4. Governing board.(a) Composition.--(1) The duties of the authority shall be exercised by a governing board consisting of the following members:(i) A member appointed by the Governor.(ii) A member appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate.(iii) A member appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.(iv) A member appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.(v) A member appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(2) Each member shall possess relevant experience in artificial intelligence, semiconductor manufacturing, cloud computing or machine learning.(3) Each member shall be a resident of this Commonwealth.(b) Terms and chairperson.--(1) The appointing authorities shall make initial appointments within 30 days of the effective date of this paragraph. A member's term shall begin on the date of appointment and shall run concurrently with the term of the appointing authority.(2) The board shall elect a chairperson from among its members at the organizational meeting and upon any vacancy in that office. The chairperson shall serve a term of two years or for the remainder of the chairperson's board term, 20250HB1625PN1966 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 whichever is first, and may be reelected for subsequent two-year terms.(3) A member shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority. Vacancies shall be filled by the appointing authority within 30 days.(c) Organization.--The appointees of the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall jointly set the date, time and location of the initial meeting of the board within five days of the appointment of all initial members. The meeting shall be held within 60 days of the effective date of this subsection. The board may elect additional officers as necessary. A member may hold more than one office within the board.(d) Meetings.--(1) The board shall meet as frequently as necessary but not less than once per fiscal quarter. A meeting shall be called by the chairperson upon written request of at least two members.(2) A majority of members shall constitute a quorum. Actions shall be taken by majority vote unless otherwise provided by the board. Meetings shall be conducted in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(e) Administrative support.--(1) The board shall appoint an executive director.(2) The department, in consultation with the executive director, shall provide administrative services and staff as necessary. Legal counsel shall be designated by the Office of General Counsel.(f) Restrictions.--No board member or executive director may seek or hold another public office in this Commonwealth or serve 20250HB1625PN1966 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as a party officer while serving with the authority.(g) Applicable laws.--The following acts shall apply to the authority:(1) The act of July 19, 1957 (P.L.1017, No.451), known as the State Adverse Interest Act.(2) The act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(3) 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 11 (relating to ethics standards and financial disclosure).Section 5. Duties of authority.(a) General duties.--The authority shall serve as the lead coordinating entity of the Commonwealth to promote the development of target industries through streamlined permitting, strategic investment and administrative efficiency.(b) Specific duties.--The authority shall have the following duties:(1) Administer this act.(2) Promote and encourage the development of target industries in this Commonwealth.(3) Develop and administer a permit navigator program to assist target industry applicants in coordinating and expediting all State-level permitting processes. The permit navigator program shall:(i) designate an employee of the authority to serve as a point of contact to work directly with all applicants and provide assistance with the coordination of necessary permitting and regulatory reviews required to move the target industry project forward in a timely fashion;(ii) offer optional preapplication conferences for 20250HB1625PN1966 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 target industry projects to identify permitting requirements, likely constraints and Commonwealth agency points of contact before formal application submission; and(iii) operate and make available on the authority's publicly accessible Internet website a permit navigator system to:(A) provide centralized permit application tracking and communication;(B) allow applicants to monitor the status of their completed applications;(C) publish performance indicators, including average permit review timelines; and(D) publish the maximum allowable permit review timelines developed under paragraph (4).(4) Coordinate with all relevant Commonwealth agencies to develop and publish maximum allowable timelines for permit reviews for target industries by submitting a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The timelines shall not exceed 90 days for initial reviews and 30 days for resubmissions. The following shall apply:(i) If a Commonwealth agency fails to act on a completed application within the established time frame, and no justified extension has been granted, the permit shall be deemed approved.(ii) If a Commonwealth agency misses a published deadline without justification, the applicant shall be entitled to a full refund of any permit processing fee or a credit toward future permit applications with the same 20250HB1625PN1966 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency.(iii) If a Commonwealth agency fails to meet the published deadline for two or more applications in a calendar year, the Commonwealth agency shall submit a written corrective action plan to the authority, the Governor and the General Assembly.(5) Coordinate with the Governor's Office of Transformation and Opportunity to ensure alignment of economic development initiatives, interagency permit facilitation and strategic investment planning.(6) Conduct examinations and investigations and hear testimony and receive evidence at public or private hearings on issues relating to the development of target industries in this Commonwealth.(7) Within six months of the date of the final appointment to the board, compile and submit to the Governor and the General Assembly a report identifying barriers to the development of target industries and recommending legislative and regulatory changes.(8) Adopt bylaws governing the internal operations of the authority.(9) Enter into contracts and execute all instruments necessary or convenient for conducting the authority's business.(10) Perform any other act necessary to carry out the purposes of this act.Section 6. Duties of other entities.All development agencies, local authorities, municipalities and Commonwealth agencies shall cooperate with the authority and provide requested documentation.20250HB1625PN1966 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 7. Artificial Intelligence Permitting System Pilot Program.(a) Establishment.--The Artificial Intelligence Permitting System Pilot Program is established within the Department of Environmental Protection for the purposes of this section.(b) Duties.--Within six months of the effective date of this subsection, the Department of Environmental Protection shall partner with an institution of higher education located in this Commonwealth that offers specialized academic programming and research in artificial intelligence to develop and implement an artificial intelligence permitting system to assist employees of the Department of Environmental Protection in the review and processing of all permit applications administered by the Department of Environmental Protection. The artificial intelligence permitting system shall meet all of the following requirements:(1) Prescreen and review a permit application for completeness, potential errors and compliance with applicable laws and regulations.(2) Assist in prioritizing the review of a permit application.(3) Provide employees of the Department of Environmental Protection with an internal dashboard that contains the following information for a permit application:(i) Current status of the permit application.(ii) The number of days since the permit application was submitted to the Department of Environmental Protection.(iii) The estimated number of days until the permit application is completed.20250HB1625PN1966 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) All relevant supporting documents included with the permit application.(v) A record of all employee actions and communications associated with the permit application.(c) Report.--Within 18 months of the effective date of this subsection, the Department of Environmental Protection shall submit a report to the General Assembly and the authority on detailing the effectiveness, employee satisfaction and efficiency of the artificial intelligence permitting system.Section 8. Keystone Artificial Intelligence Development Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Keystone Artificial Intelligence Development Fund is established as a restricted fund in the State Treasury.(b) Appropriation.--Money and accrued interest in the fund are appropriated to the authority on a continuing basis to implement this act.Section 9. Fiscal year.The fiscal year of the authority shall be the same as that of the Commonwealth.Section 10. Sovereign immunity.Board members shall not be personally liable for the obligations of the authority. The authority and its officials and employees shall have sovereign and official immunity under 1 Pa.C.S. § 2310 (relating to sovereign immunity reaffirmed; specific waiver) and 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 85 (relating to matters affecting government units).Section 11. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1625PN1966 - 9 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728